Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 8.5
PROVISIONAL BALLOTS

Section

1-8.5-101. Provisional ballot - entitlement to vote.

At any election conducted pursuant to this title, a voter claiming to be properly registered but whose qualification or entitlement to vote cannot be immediately established upon examination of the registration list or upon examination of the records on file with the county clerk and recorder by election judges at the polling location is entitled to cast a provisional ballot in accordance with this article.

An elector who desires to vote but does not show identification in accordance with section 1-7-110 (2) may cast a provisional ballot.

Repealed.

No elector shall be denied the right to cast a provisional ballot in any election held pursuant to this title.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1415, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1450, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1794, § 54, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended and (5) added, (HB 09-1216), ch. 165, p. 730, § 7, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(1) amended and (3) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 744, § 106, effective May 10.

Initiated 2016:

(5) amended, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2827.

L. 2021:

(5) repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1650, § 41, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section was amended by initiative in 2016. The vote count on Proposition 108 at the general election held November 8, 2016, was as follows:

FOR: :u940 1,398,577

AGAINST: :u940 1,227,117

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsection (1) was amended and subsection (3) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the declaration of the people of Colorado in Proposition 108, see section 1 on p. 2822, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

1-8.5-101.5. Electronic voting device - use for casting provisional ballot.

An electronic voting device may be used to cast a provisional ballot if the device is certified by the secretary of state for that purpose.

If an electronic voting device that is certified for use with provisional ballots is used in an election, the designated election official shall determine whether electors casting provisional ballots shall use the electronic voting device or paper provisional ballots.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 2033, § 15, effective June 6.

1-8.5-102. Form of provisional ballot.

A provisional ballot shall contain text clearly identifying it as a provisional ballot.

An elector casting a provisional ballot shall complete an affidavit and receive information and instructions on the voting and handling of provisional ballots. The secretary of state shall prescribe by rules promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the language of the affidavit, information, and instructions.

Each polling location using paper provisional ballots must have on hand a sufficient number of provisional ballots in all ballot styles applicable to that polling location and a sufficient number of provisional ballot envelopes.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1415, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1450, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 2033, § 16, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 745, § 107, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (3) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.5-103. Provisional ballot affidavit.

The provisional ballot affidavit shall contain language prescribed by the secretary of state by rule and shall include an attestation, a notice of perjury, a warning of the penalty for falsifying the affidavit, and information sufficient to verify the elector's eligibility to vote and to register the elector to vote or transfer the elector's registration.

The provisional ballot affidavit shall constitute a voter registration application for the voter for future elections. Any previous voter registration for the voter shall be canceled pursuant to section 1-2-603 (1).

This subsection (2) does not apply to an elector who casts a provisional ballot pursuant to section 1-8.5-101 (2).

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1415, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1450, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 745, § 108, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (2)(b) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.5-104. Voting procedure - provisional ballot.

An elector casting a provisional ballot shall complete and sign the provisional ballot affidavit and cast the ballot.

The fact that an elector casts a provisional ballot shall be indicated on the signature card or pollbook next to the elector's name.

The election judge shall examine the provisional ballot affidavit. If the election judge notices that the elector did not sign the affidavit, the election judge shall inform the elector that the provisional ballot will not be counted if the affidavit is not signed.

If an elector who is casting a provisional ballot does not show identification as required by section 1-7-110 (2), the election official shall indicate on a space provided on the provisional ballot envelope that the elector did not show identification.

If paper provisional ballots and envelopes are used in an election, the provisional ballot envelope containing the marked provisional ballot shall be deposited in a ballot container. All paper provisional ballots cast shall remain sealed in their envelopes for return to the county clerk and recorder or designated election official.

After an elector casts a provisional ballot, the election official shall give the elector a written notice that an elector who casts a provisional ballot has the right to know whether the vote was counted and the reason if the provisional ballot was not counted. The notice shall specify the toll-free telephone number, internet website, or other free access system established by the secretary of state or the designated election official by means of which the elector may receive this information about the elector's provisional ballot.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1416, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1451, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 2033, § 17, effective June 6.

1-8.5-105. Verification of provisional ballot information - counting procedure.

In accordance with this section and using the procedures and databases prescribed by the secretary of state by rules promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the designated election official shall attempt to verify that an elector who cast a provisional ballot is eligible to vote. The designated election official or designee shall complete the preliminary verification of the elector's eligibility to vote before the ballot is counted in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

If the elector signs but does not fill in all the information requested on the provisional ballot affidavit, the ballot shall be counted only if the designated election official is able to determine that the elector was eligible to vote in the precinct and county.

If a provisional ballot affidavit is not signed, the designated election official shall send a letter to the elector within three days after the signature deficiency has been confirmed, but in no event later than two days after the election, informing the elector that the affidavit was not signed and that the provisional ballot cannot be counted unless the affidavit is signed. The letter shall state that the elector may come to the office of the county clerk and recorder to sign the provisional ballot affidavit no later than eight days after the election.

If the elector does not sign the provisional ballot affidavit after receiving notice pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the provisional ballot shall not be counted.

The designated election official shall retain a copy of the letter sent pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3).

The designated election official shall determine the time for the verification and counting of provisional ballots to begin in accordance with rules promulgated by the secretary of state. A board appointed by the designated election official shall count all verified provisional ballots in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the designated election official in accordance with this title and the election rules of the secretary of state.

The designated election official shall complete the verification and counting of all provisional ballots within nine days after a primary, general, odd-year, or coordinated election, or within an alternate period of time, if necessary, as designated by the secretary of state. The designated election official shall count all regular ballots cast in an election before counting any provisional ballots.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1416, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1451, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 2034, § 18, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(5) amended, p. 1795, § 55, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 09-1337), ch. 262, p. 1203, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(5) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 745, § 109, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1615, § 32, effective May 29.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (5) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.5-106. Counting of provisional ballots.

If the designated election official verifies that an elector who cast a provisional ballot in accordance with this article is eligible to vote, the provisional ballot shall be counted. If the elector's registration cannot be verified, the ballot shall not be counted.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1417, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1452, § 39, effective June 6.

1-8.5-107. Electors who move before close of registration - effect of provisional ballot. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1417, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1452, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.5-108. Electors who move after close of registration - effect of provisional ballot. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1418, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1453, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 2034, § 19, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.5-109. Electors who vote outside precinct of residence - effect of provisional ballot. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1418, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1453, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 2035, § 20, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 280, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.5-110. Handling of provisional ballots - reporting of results.

Provisional ballots shall be kept separate from all other ballots and counted separately.

If twenty-five or more provisional ballots are cast and counted in a county, the designated election official shall report the results of voting by provisional ballot as a separate total. If fewer than twenty-five provisional ballots are cast and counted, the results of voting by provisional ballot shall be included in the results of regular voting.

Votes cast by provisional ballot shall not be included in any unofficial results reported and shall be reported only as part of the official canvass.

The designated election official shall keep a log of each provisional ballot cast, each provisional ballot counted, and each provisional ballot rejected. The code for the acceptance or rejection of the provisional ballot as prescribed by the secretary of state shall be marked on the log. The designated election official shall keep all rejected provisional ballots in their unopened envelopes for no less than twenty-five months.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1418, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1453, § 39, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1795, § 56, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 745, § 110, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (2) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-8.5-111. Information system.

For any election held on or after January 1, 2004, in which a provisional ballot is cast, the county clerk and recorder or designated election official shall establish a system allowing an elector who cast a provisional ballot to discover whether the ballot was counted and, if the ballot was not counted, the reason the ballot was not counted. The system shall provide access to this information at no cost to the voter by toll-free telephone call, internet website, or other suitable medium, in accordance with the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002", Pub.L. 107-252. Information about a provisional ballot shall be disclosed only to the voter who cast the ballot.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1419, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1454, § 39, effective June 6.

1-8.5-112. Rules.

The secretary of state shall promulgate all appropriate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., for the purpose of ensuring the uniform application of this article.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1419, § 39, effective June 6; entire article added, p. 1454, § 39, effective June 6.